Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 9. State Engineer

Cross references. —

As to surveyors and engineers generally, see §§ 33-29-114 to 33-29-139.

§ 9-1-901.
Qualifications.

The state engineer shall have theoretical knowledge and practical and managerial skill and experience which fits him for the position and shall have at least two (2) years of engineering practice and experience in the state and shall be a registered professional engineer.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 101; C.S. 1910, § 149; C.S. 1920, § 159; R.S. 1931, § 109-901; C.S. 1945, § 18-1103; Laws 1953, ch. 188, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-138; Laws 1971, ch. 27, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-602; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 185, § 1.

§ 9-1-902.
Duties and powers; representation of state at proceedings relating to water or water use.

The state engineer shall:

Measure and calculate the discharge of streams, from which water is taken for beneficial purposes, commencing work upon those streams most used for irrigation or other beneficial purposes;

Collect facts and make surveys to determine the most suitable location for constructing works for utilizing the water of the state and to ascertain the location of the lands best suited for irrigation;

Examine reservoir sites;

Include in his reports all the facts ascertained by the surveys and examinations, including, wherever practicable, estimates of the cost of proposed irrigation works and of the improvement of reservoir sites;

Know the waterways of the state, and the needs of the state as to irrigation matters;

Suggest to the governor the amendment or enactment of laws to benefit the state; and

Keep in his office complete records of his work, observations and calculations, all of which shall be the property of the state.

The state engineer may appear and represent the state of Wyoming in any proceeding or hearing concerning or relating to water or its use, including congressional hearings and hearings before any department, bureau or agency of the United States or of any state.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 104; C.S. 1910, § 152; C.S. 1920, § 162; R.S. 1931, § 109-904; C.S. 1945, § 18-1104; W.S. 1957, § 9-139; Laws 1969, ch. 99, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-603

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-903.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 94, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1, related to appointment of deputy, first assistant and second assistant state engineers.

§ 9-1-904.
Collection of fees.

The state engineer shall specify by rule and regulation and receive the following nonrefundable fees which shall be collected in advance:

For recording any water right instrument or certificate not otherwise specifically provided for, a reasonable fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) per page;

For making copies of any document recorded or filed in the state engineer’s office, a reasonable fee shall be assessed not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) per page;

A reasonable fee not to exceed the amount shown shall accompany applications for appropriations for the direct use of the natural unstored flow of water from any surface water source except groundwater as follows:

If water is to be used only for stock or domestic purposes — fifty dollars ($50.00);

Water used for all other purposes — one hundred dollars ($100.00).

A reasonable fee not to exceed the amount specified shall accompany applications for the storage of water as follows:

For reservoirs twenty (20) acre-feet or less — fifty dollars ($50.00) each;

For reservoirs greater than twenty (20) acre-feet but less than one hundred (100) acre-feet — one hundred dollars ($100.00) each;

For all other reservoirs — two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) each;

Secondary supply applications — one hundred dollars ($100.00) each;

Reservoir supply ditch applications — one hundred dollars ($100.00) each.

A reasonable fee not to exceed the amount specified shall accompany groundwater applications:

Domestic or stock wells, twenty-five gallons per minute (25 g.p.m.) or less, — fifty dollars (50.00);

Monitor wells — no fee required;

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 146, § 4.

All other wells or groundwater developments — one hundred dollars ($100.00).

A reasonable fee not to exceed the amounts shown shall accompany all safety of dams plan reviews required or submitted in accordance with W.S.

41-3-308

as follows:

For dams more than twenty (20) feet but less than forty (40) feet in height or with a capacity of fifty (50) acre-feet or more but less than one hundred (100) acre-feet — one hundred dollars ($100.00) each;

For dams forty (40) feet in height or more or with a capacity of one hundred (100) acre-feet or more — two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) each.

Reasonable fees for computer and other technical services related to providing water resources information.

The state engineer shall specify by rule and regulation an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) of the fees collected for each application for a permit under subparagraphs (a)(v)(A) and (D) of this section to be deposited into the account created under W.S.

33-42-116

for wells which require the use of a licensed well driller pursuant to W.S.

33-42-103

.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 79, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 108; Laws 1905, ch. 82, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 156; C.S. 1920, § 166; Laws 1929, ch. 49, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 109-908; C.S. 1945, § 18-1108; W.S. 1957, § 9-144; Laws 1965, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-608; Laws 1979, ch. 56, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1993, ch. 123, § 1; ch. 146, § 4; 2008, ch. 89, § 2; 2014 ch. 89, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (b).

The 2014 amendment,

in (b), substituted “fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

Laws 2014, ch. 89, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 9-1-905.
Weather modification; legislative declarations.

It is hereby declared that:

The state of Wyoming claims its sovereign right to the use for its residents and best interests of the moisture contained in the clouds and atmosphere within its sovereign state boundaries;

Although little is known regarding artificial weather modification, research and experimentation shall be encouraged;

Although the ultimate use of modification methods is speculative, the application of such methods should have proper safeguards and provide sufficient data to protect life, property and public interest.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 131, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-267; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1501; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to sovereignty in space above the state, see §

10-4-301

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For note, “Are There Individual Property Rights in Clouds?,” see 15 Wyo. L.J. 92 (1960).

For article, “Legal Aspects of Weather Modification Snowpack Augmentation in Wyoming,” see 2 Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1967).

§ 9-1-906.
Weather modification defined; duty of state engineer to gather information relative to experiments in state.

The state engineer shall procure, compile and evaluate information relative to weather modification experiments and activities within the state boundaries. The term “weather modification” means attempting to change or control any of the weather phenomena by chemical, mechanical or physical methods.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 131, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-269; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1503; Laws 1981, ch. 5, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-907.
Weather modification; permit required; issuance; duration; fee; report of activities; penalties for noncompliance.

It is unlawful for anyone to engage in weather modification activities except by permit prescribed and issued by the state engineer.

A separate permit shall be issued for each experiment or activity. Permits are revocable by the state engineer. Permits are to be issued for one (1) year from October 1 of one year to September 30 of the following year. A fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be charged for each permit issued or renewed. Fees received by the state engineer shall be deposited with the state treasurer to be placed into the general fund. A permit shall be issued only to a person who can demonstrate to the state engineer’s satisfaction that he has adequate qualifications in the atmospheric sciences. The state engineer shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this act.

The state engineer shall demand and receive a written report, in such manner as he shall provide, covering each separate experiment or activity for which a permit is issued.

Any person engaging in a weather modification experiment without a permit is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is subject to a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 131, §§ 4, 5, 7, 10; 1955, ch. 166, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-270, 9-271, 9-273, 9-274; Laws 1965, ch. 66, § 1; 1971, ch. 104, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-1504 to 9-3-1507; Laws 1981, ch. 5, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1993, ch. 123, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” refers to Laws 1981, ch. 5, § 1, which appears as §§

9-1-906

through

9-1-908

.

§ 9-1-908.
Weather modification; authority to receive and expend funds; purposes.

The state engineer is authorized to receive in the name of the state any funds offered or available from any source, and to expend such funds for the expenses of administering this act and for the encouragement of experimentation in weather modification by the University of Wyoming or any other appropriate state or public agency, either by direct grant, by contract or other cooperative means.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 131, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 9-275; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1508; Laws 1981, ch. 5, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” refers to Laws 1951, ch. 131, which appears as §§

9-1-905

through

9-1-909

.

§ 9-1-909.
Weather modification; state not liable for activities of private persons or groups.

Nothing in W.S.

9-1-905

through

9-1-909

shall be construed to impose or accept any liability or responsibility on the part of the state, the board, or any state officials or employees, for any weather modification activities of any private person or group, nor to affect in any way any contractual, tortious, or other legal rights, duties or liabilities between any private persons or groups.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 131, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 9-276; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1509; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

State engineer. —

The term “the board” refers to the state weather modification board, created by § 2, ch. 131, Laws 1951, codified as former § 9-3-1502. Section 9-3-1502 was repealed by § 2, ch. 5, Laws 1981. The functions of the former board were transferred to the state engineer by § 1, ch. 5, Laws 1981. See §

9-1-906

.